West Virginia, session 2025, HB2218.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 12.  OFFENSES RELATED TO MEDICAL CANNABIS. §16A-12-10.  Adulteration or alteration of medical cannabis testing results. In addition to any other penalty provided by law, any person who adulterates, alters, fortifies, contaminates, or changes the tested character or purity of medical cannabis either from its actual potency or from that set forth on the patient’s or caregiver’s identification card, is guilty of a felony, and, upon conviction thereof:(1) In the case of a non-natural person, shall be fined up to $2.5 million per incident and have any medical cannabis licenses permanently revoked; or(2) For any natural person, shall be fined up to $100,000 per incident and shall be imprisoned in a state correctional facility for not less than one nor more than five years.